Utah statutes.
78B-5-813.   Statement of injured person -- When inadmissible as evidence.
Except as otherwise provided in Sections 78B-5-812 through 78B-5-816, any
statement, either written or oral, obtained from an injured person within 15
days of an occurrence or while the person is confined in a hospital or
sanitarium as a result of injuries sustained in the occurrence, and which
statement is obtained by a person whose interest is adverse or may become
adverse to the injured person, except a peace officer, is not admissible as
evidence in any civil proceeding brought by or against the injured person for
damages sustained as a result of the occurrence, unless:
(1)  a written verbatim copy of the statement has been left with the injured
party at the time the statement was taken; and
(2)  the statement has not been disavowed in writing within 15 days of the
date of the statement or within 15 days after the date of the injured person's
initial discharge from the hospital or sanitarium in which the person has been
confined, whichever date is later.
